Florida, session 2026, HB263.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
19
20 Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subsection (4) of section
21 119.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
22 119.071 General exemptions from inspection or copying of
23 public records.—
24 (4) AGENCY PERSONNEL INFORMATION.—
25 (d)1. For purposes of this paragraph, the term:
Page 1 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
26 a. "Home addresses" means the dwelling location at which
27 an individual resides and includes the physical address, mailing
28 address, street address, parcel identification number, plot
29 identification number, legal property description, neighborhood
30 name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other descriptive
31 property information that may reveal the home address.
32 b. "Judicial assistant" means a court employee assigned to
33 the following class codes: 8140, 8150, 8310, and 8320.
34 c. "Telephone numbers" includes home telephone numbers,
35 personal cellular telephone numbers, personal pager telephone
36 numbers, and telephone numbers associated with personal
37 communications devices.
38 2.a. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of
39 birth, and photographs of active or former sworn law enforcement
40 personnel or of active or former civilian personnel employed by
41 a law enforcement agency, including correctional and
42 correctional probation officers, personnel of the Department of
43 Children and Families whose duties include the investigation of
44 abuse, neglect, exploitation, fraud, theft, or other criminal
45 activities, personnel of the Department of Health whose duties
46 are to support the investigation of child abuse or neglect, and
47 personnel of the Department of Revenue or local governments
48 whose responsibilities include revenue collection and
49 enforcement or child support enforcement; the names, home
50 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and
Page 2 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
51 places of employment of the spouses and children of such
52 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
53 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
54 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
55 Constitution.
56 b. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
57 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative
58 personnel of the Department of Financial Services whose duties
59 include the investigation of fraud, theft, workers' compensation
60 coverage requirements and compliance, other related criminal
61 activities, or state regulatory requirement violations; the
62 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
63 places of employment of the spouses and children of such
64 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
65 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
66 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
67 Constitution.
68 c. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
69 and photographs of current or former nonsworn investigative
70 personnel of the Office of Financial Regulation's Bureau of
71 Financial Investigations whose duties include the investigation
72 of fraud, theft, other related criminal activities, or state
73 regulatory requirement violations; the names, home addresses,
74 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
75 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and
Page 3 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
76 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
77 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
78 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
79 d. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
80 and photographs of current or former firefighters certified in
81 compliance with s. 633.408; the names, home addresses, telephone
82 numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment
83 of the spouses and children of such firefighters; and the names
84 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
85 children of such firefighters are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
86 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
87 e. The home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone
88 numbers of current or former justices of the Supreme Court,
89 district court of appeal judges, circuit court judges, and
90 county court judges and current judicial assistants; the names,
91 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of
92 employment of the spouses and children of current or former
93 justices and judges and current judicial assistants; and the
94 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
95 by the children of current or former justices and judges and of
96 current judicial assistants are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
97 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph
98 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in
99 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2,
100 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment
Page 4 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
101 by the Legislature.
102 f. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
103 and photographs of current or former state attorneys, assistant
104 state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant statewide
105 prosecutors; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
106 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the
107 spouses and children of current or former state attorneys,
108 assistant state attorneys, statewide prosecutors, or assistant
109 statewide prosecutors; and the names and locations of schools
110 and day care facilities attended by the children of current or
111 former state attorneys, assistant state attorneys, statewide
112 prosecutors, or assistant statewide prosecutors are exempt from
113 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
114 g. The home addresses, dates of birth, and telephone
115 numbers of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of
116 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division
117 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement
118 hearing officers; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
119 dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and
120 children of general magistrates, special magistrates, judges of
121 compensation claims, administrative law judges of the Division
122 of Administrative Hearings, and child support enforcement
123 hearing officers; and the names and locations of schools and day
124 care facilities attended by the children of general magistrates,
125 special magistrates, judges of compensation claims,
Page 5 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
126 administrative law judges of the Division of Administrative
127 Hearings, and child support enforcement hearing officers are
128 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
129 Constitution.
130 h. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
131 and photographs of current or former human resource, labor
132 relations, or employee relations directors, assistant directors,
133 managers, or assistant managers of any local government agency
134 or water management district whose duties include hiring and
135 firing employees, labor contract negotiation, administration, or
136 other personnel-related duties; the names, home addresses,
137 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
138 the spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and
139 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
140 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
141 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
142 i. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
143 and photographs of current or former code enforcement officers;
144 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
145 and places of employment of the spouses and children of such
146 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
147 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
148 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
149 Constitution.
150 j. The home addresses, telephone numbers, places of
Page 6 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
151 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former
152 guardians ad litem, as defined in s. 39.01; the names, home
153 addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of
154 employment of the spouses and children of such persons; and the
155 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
156 by the children of such persons are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
157 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
158 k. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
159 and photographs of current or former juvenile probation
160 officers, juvenile probation supervisors, detention
161 superintendents, assistant detention superintendents, juvenile
162 justice detention officers I and II, juvenile justice detention
163 officer supervisors, juvenile justice residential officers,
164 juvenile justice residential officer supervisors I and II,
165 juvenile justice counselors, juvenile justice counselor
166 supervisors, human services counselor administrators, senior
167 human services counselor administrators, rehabilitation
168 therapists, and social services counselors of the Department of
169 Juvenile Justice; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
170 dates of birth, and places of employment of spouses and children
171 of such personnel; and the names and locations of schools and
172 day care facilities attended by the children of such personnel
173 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
174 Constitution.
175 l. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
Page 7 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
176 and photographs of current or former public defenders, assistant
177 public defenders, criminal conflict and civil regional counsel,
178 and assistant criminal conflict and civil regional counsel; the
179 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
180 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or
181 former public defenders, assistant public defenders, criminal
182 conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant criminal
183 conflict and civil regional counsel; and the names and locations
184 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of
185 current or former public defenders, assistant public defenders,
186 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel, and assistant
187 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel are exempt from s.
188 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
189 m. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
190 and photographs of current or former investigators or inspectors
191 of the Department of Business and Professional Regulation; the
192 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
193 places of employment of the spouses and children of such current
194 or former investigators and inspectors; and the names and
195 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
196 children of such current or former investigators and inspectors
197 are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
198 Constitution.
199 n. The home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of
200 birth of county tax collectors; the names, home addresses,
Page 8 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
201 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
202 the spouses and children of such tax collectors; and the names
203 and locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
204 children of such tax collectors are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and
205 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
206 o. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
207 and photographs of current or former personnel of the Department
208 of Health whose duties include, or result in, the determination
209 or adjudication of eligibility for social security disability
210 benefits, the investigation or prosecution of complaints filed
211 against health care practitioners, or the inspection of health
212 care practitioners or health care facilities licensed by the
213 Department of Health; the names, home addresses, telephone
214 numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of the spouses
215 and children of such personnel; and the names and locations of
216 schools and day care facilities attended by the children of such
217 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of
218 the State Constitution.
219 p. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
220 and photographs of current or former impaired practitioner
221 consultants who are retained by an agency or current or former
222 employees of an impaired practitioner consultant whose duties
223 result in a determination of a person's skill and safety to
224 practice a licensed profession; the names, home addresses,
225 telephone numbers, dates of birth, and places of employment of
Page 9 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
226 the spouses and children of such consultants or their employees;
227 and the names and locations of schools and day care facilities
228 attended by the children of such consultants or employees are
229 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
230 Constitution.
231 q. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
232 and photographs of current or former emergency medical
233 technicians or paramedics certified under chapter 401; the
234 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
235 places of employment of the spouses and children of such
236 emergency medical technicians or paramedics; and the names and
237 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
238 children of such emergency medical technicians or paramedics are
239 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
240 Constitution.
241 r. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
242 and photographs of current or former personnel employed in an
243 agency's office of inspector general or internal audit
244 department whose duties include auditing or investigating waste,
245 fraud, abuse, theft, exploitation, or other activities that
246 could lead to criminal prosecution or administrative discipline;
247 the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
248 and places of employment of spouses and children of such
249 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
250 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
Page 10 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
251 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
252 Constitution.
253 s. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
254 and photographs of current or former directors, managers,
255 supervisors, nurses, and clinical employees of an addiction
256 treatment facility; the home addresses, telephone numbers,
257 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the
258 spouses and children of such personnel; and the names and
259 locations of schools and day care facilities attended by the
260 children of such personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
261 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. For purposes of this
262 sub-subparagraph, the term "addiction treatment facility" means
263 a county government, or agency thereof, that is licensed
264 pursuant to s. 397.401 and provides substance abuse prevention,
265 intervention, or clinical treatment, including any licensed
266 service component described in s. 397.311(27).
267 t. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
268 and photographs of current or former directors, managers,
269 supervisors, and clinical employees of a child advocacy center
270 that meets the standards of s. 39.3035(2) and fulfills the
271 screening requirement of s. 39.3035(3), and the members of a
272 Child Protection Team as described in s. 39.303 whose duties
273 include supporting the investigation of child abuse or sexual
274 abuse, child abandonment, child neglect, and child exploitation
275 or to provide services as part of a multidisciplinary case
Page 11 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
276 review team; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers,
277 photographs, dates of birth, and places of employment of the
278 spouses and children of such personnel and members; and the
279 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
280 by the children of such personnel and members are exempt from s.
281 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
282 u. The home addresses, telephone numbers, places of
283 employment, dates of birth, and photographs of current or former
284 staff and domestic violence advocates, as defined in s.
285 90.5036(1)(b), of domestic violence centers certified by the
286 Department of Children and Families under chapter 39; the names,
287 home addresses, telephone numbers, places of employment, dates
288 of birth, and photographs of the spouses and children of such
289 personnel; and the names and locations of schools and day care
290 facilities attended by the children of such personnel are exempt
291 from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
292 Constitution.
293 v. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
294 and photographs of current or former inspectors or investigators
295 of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the
296 names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, and
297 places of employment of the spouses and children of current or
298 former inspectors or investigators; and the names and locations
299 of schools and day care facilities attended by the children of
300 current or former inspectors or investigators are exempt from s.
Page 12 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
301 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This
302 sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review
303 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on
304 October 2, 2028, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through
305 reenactment by the Legislature.
306 w. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
307 and photographs of current county attorneys, assistant county
308 attorneys, deputy county attorneys, city attorneys, assistant
309 city attorneys, and deputy city attorneys; the names, home
310 addresses, telephone numbers, photographs, dates of birth, and
311 places of employment of the spouses and children of current
312 county attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county
313 attorneys, city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy
314 city attorneys; and the names and locations of schools and day
315 care facilities attended by the children of current county
316 attorneys, assistant county attorneys, deputy county attorneys,
317 city attorneys, assistant city attorneys, and deputy city
318 attorneys are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of
319 the State Constitution. This exemption does not apply to a
320 county attorney, assistant county attorney, deputy county
321 attorney, city attorney, assistant city attorney, or deputy city
322 attorney who qualifies as a candidate for election to public
323 office. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open Government
324 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand
325 repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved from
Page 13 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
326 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
327 x. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
328 and photographs of current or former commissioners of the
329 Florida Gaming Control Commission; the names, home addresses,
330 telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs, and places of
331 employment of the spouses and children of such current or former
332 commissioners; and the names and locations of schools and day
333 care facilities attended by the children of such current or
334 former commissioners are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a),
335 Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is
336 subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance
337 with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029,
338 unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the
339 Legislature.
340 y. The home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth,
341 and photographs of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy
342 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court
343 personnel; the names, home addresses, telephone numbers, dates
344 of birth, and places of employment of the spouses and children
345 of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy clerks of the
346 circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court personnel; and the
347 names and locations of schools and day care facilities attended
348 by the children of current clerks of the circuit court, deputy
349 clerks of the circuit court, and clerk of the circuit court
350 personnel are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of
Page 14 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
351 the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph is subject to the
352 Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15
353 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and
354 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
355 z.(I) As used in this sub-subparagraph, the term:
356 (A) "Congressional member" means a person who is elected
357 to serve as a member of the United States House of
358 Representatives or is elected or appointed to serve as a member
359 of the United States Senate.
360 (B) "Partial home address" means the dwelling location at
361 which an individual resides and includes the physical address,
362 mailing address, street address, parcel identification number,
363 plot identification number, legal property description,
364 neighborhood name and lot number, GPS coordinates, and any other
365 descriptive property information that may reveal the partial
366 home address, except for the city and zip code.
367 (C) "Public officer" means a person who holds one of the
368 following offices: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Chief
369 Financial Officer, Attorney General, Agriculture Commissioner,
370 state representative, state senator, property appraiser,
371 supervisor of elections, school superintendent, school board
372 member, mayor, city commissioner, or county commissioner.
373 (II) The following information is exempt from s. 119.07(1)
374 and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution:
375 (A) The partial home addresses of a current congressional
Page 15 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
376 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child.
377 (B) The telephone numbers of a current congressional
378 member or public officer and his or her spouse or adult child.
379 (C) The name, home addresses, telephone numbers, and date
380 of birth of a minor child of a current congressional member or
381 public officer and the name and location of the school or day
382 care facility attended by the minor child.
383 (III) This sub-subparagraph is subject to the Open
384 Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and
385 shall stand repealed on October 2, 2030, unless reviewed and
386 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature.
387 aa. The home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates of
388 birth of current county administrators, deputy county
389 administrators, assistant county administrators, city managers,
390 deputy city managers, and assistant city managers; the names,
391 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs,
392 and places of employment of the spouses and children of current
393 county administrators, deputy county administrators, assistant
394 county administrators, city managers, deputy city managers, and
395 assistant city managers; and the names and locations of schools
396 and day care facilities attended by the children of current
397 county administrators, deputy county administrators, assistant
398 county administrators, city managers, deputy city managers, and
399 assistant city managers are exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
400 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This sub-subparagraph
Page 16 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
401 is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in
402 accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2,
403 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment
404 by the Legislature.
405 3.a. An agency that is the custodian of the information
406 specified in subparagraph 2. and that is not the employer of the
407 officer, employee, justice, judge, or other person specified in
408 subparagraph 2. must maintain the exempt status of that
409 information only if the officer, employee, justice, judge, other
410 person, or employing agency of the designated employee submits a
411 written and notarized request for maintenance of the exemption
412 to the custodial agency. The request must state under oath the
413 statutory basis for the individual's exemption request and
414 confirm the individual's status as a party eligible for exempt
415 status.
416 b. An agency that is the custodian of information
417 specified in sub-subparagraph 2.z. and that is not the employer
418 of the congressional member, public officer, or other person
419 specified in sub-subparagraph 2.z. must maintain the exempt
420 status of that information only if an individual requests the
421 maintenance of an exemption pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.z. on
422 the basis of eligibility as a current congressional member or
423 public officer and his or her spouse or child submits, as part
424 of the written and notarized request required by sub-
425 subparagraph a., the date of the congressional member's or
Page 17 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
426 public officer's election or appointment to public office, the
427 date on which that office is next subject to election, and, if
428 applicable, the date on which the current congressional member's
429 or public officer's minor child reaches the age of majority. The
430 custodian must maintain an exemption granted pursuant to sub-
431 subparagraph 2.z. until the qualifying conditions for the
432 exemption no longer apply to the person subject to the
433 exemption.
434 4.a. A county property appraiser, as defined in s.
435 192.001(3), or a county tax collector, as defined in s.
436 192.001(4), who receives a written and notarized request for
437 maintenance of the exemption pursuant to subparagraph 3. must
438 comply by removing the name of the individual with exempt status
439 and the instrument number or Official Records book and page
440 number identifying the property with the exempt status from all
441 publicly available records maintained by the property appraiser
442 or tax collector. For written requests received on or before
443 July 1, 2021, a county property appraiser or county tax
444 collector must comply with this sub-subparagraph by October 1,
445 2021. A county property appraiser or county tax collector may
446 not remove the street address, legal description, or other
447 information identifying real property within the agency's
448 records so long as a name or personal information otherwise
449 exempt from inspection and copying pursuant to this section is
450 not associated with the property or otherwise displayed in the
Page 18 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
451 public records of the agency.
452 b. Any information restricted from public display,
453 inspection, or copying under sub-subparagraph a. must be
454 provided to the individual whose information was removed.
455 5. An officer, an employee, a justice, a judge, or other
456 person specified in subparagraph 2. may submit a written request
457 for the release of his or her exempt information to the
458 custodial agency. The written request must be notarized and must
459 specify the information to be released and the party authorized
460 to receive the information. Upon receipt of the written request,
461 the custodial agency must release the specified information to
462 the party authorized to receive such information.
463 6. The exemptions in this paragraph apply to information
464 held by an agency before, on, or after the effective date of the
465 exemption.
466 7. Information made exempt under this paragraph may be
467 disclosed pursuant to s. 28.2221 to a title insurer authorized
468 pursuant to s. 624.401 and its affiliates as defined in s.
469 624.10; a title insurance agent or title insurance agency as
470 defined in s. 626.841(1) or (2), respectively; or an attorney
471 duly admitted to practice law in this state and in good standing
472 with The Florida Bar.
473 8. The exempt status of a home address contained in the
474 Official Records is maintained only during the period when a
475 protected party resides at the dwelling location. Upon
Page 19 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
476 conveyance of real property after October 1, 2021, and when such
477 real property no longer constitutes a protected party's home
478 address as defined in sub-subparagraph 1.a., the protected party
479 must submit a written request to release the removed information
480 to the county recorder. The written request to release the
481 removed information must be notarized, must confirm that a
482 protected party's request for release is pursuant to a
483 conveyance of his or her dwelling location, and must specify the
484 Official Records book and page, instrument number, or clerk's
485 file number for each document containing the information to be
486 released.
487 9. Upon the death of a protected party as verified by a
488 certified copy of a death certificate or court order, any party
489 can request the county recorder to release a protected
490 decedent's removed information unless there is a related request
491 on file with the county recorder for continued removal of the
492 decedent's information or unless such removal is otherwise
493 prohibited by statute or by court order. The written request to
494 release the removed information upon the death of a protected
495 party must attach the certified copy of a death certificate or
496 court order and must be notarized, must confirm the request for
497 release is due to the death of a protected party, and must
498 specify the Official Records book and page number, instrument
499 number, or clerk's file number for each document containing the
500 information to be released. A fee may not be charged for the
Page 20 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
501 release of any document pursuant to such request.
502 Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
503 necessity that the home addresses, telephone numbers, and dates
504 of birth of current county administrators, deputy county
505 administrators, assistant county administrators, city managers,
506 deputy city managers, and assistant city managers; the names,
507 home addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, photographs,
508 and places of employment of the spouses and children of current
509 county administrators, deputy county administrators, assistant
510 county administrators, city managers, deputy city managers, and
511 assistant city managers; and the names and locations of schools
512 and day care facilities attended by the children of current
513 county administrators, deputy county administrators, assistant
514 county administrators, city managers, deputy city managers, and
515 assistant city managers be made exempt from s. 119.07(1),
516 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State
517 Constitution. Such identifying and location information can be
518 used as a tool to perpetrate fraud against an individual or to
519 acquire sensitive personal, financial, medical, or familial
520 information, the release of which could cause great financial or
521 professional harm to the individual. In the course of performing
522 their managerial functions, current county administrators,
523 deputy county administrators, assistant county administrators,
524 city managers, deputy city managers, and assistant city managers
525 may make decisions and determinations that upset members of the
Page 21 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 263 2026
526 public and may incur the ill will of those residents, making
527 current county administrators, deputy county administrators,
528 assistant county administrators, city managers, deputy city
529 managers, and assistant city managers and their spouses and
530 children targets for acts of revenge. If such identifying and
531 location information is released, the safety of current county
532 administrators, deputy county administrators, assistant county
533 administrators, city managers, deputy city managers, and
534 assistant city managers and their spouses and children could be
535 seriously jeopardized. For these reasons, the Legislature finds
536 that it is a public necessity that such information be made
537 exempt from public records requirements.
538 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 22 of 22
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb263-00